apertium-oci.oci.metadix
        <pardef n="moss/egar__vblex">                
      <e><p><l>egaríem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaria</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaríetz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaries</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egarien</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egarie</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaram</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egarè</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaratz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaràs</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaràn</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egarà</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egant</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egant</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèrem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguè</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèretz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguès</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>eguères</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèren</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèc</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguegam</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguésquem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguegam</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguésquem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>egatz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egatz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>egar</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egar</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>egà</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>egà</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egà</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>egàuem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaua</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egàuetz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaues</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egauen</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egaue</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egàvem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egava</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egàvetz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egaves</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egaven</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egave</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>eguèssem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèssa</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèssetz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèsses</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèssen</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguèsse</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egades</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egadas</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egada</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egaa</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egats</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>egadi</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egat</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egam</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>egatz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>eguem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguegam</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguésquem</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>eguetz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguegatz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eguésquetz</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>èga</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>èga</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>èguen</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>èguen</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>ègue</l><r>egar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                

    <e lm="belegar"><i>bel</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="estossegar"><i>estoss</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="legar"><i>l</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mossegar"><i>moss</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="negar" alt="oci"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="negar" alt="oci@aran"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="negar" alt="oci@gascon"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="denegar" alt="oci"><i>den</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="denegar" alt="oci@aran"><i>den</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="denegar" alt="oci@gascon"><i>den</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="negar a" alt="oci" r="LR"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a</l><r><g><b/>a</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="negar a" alt="oci@aran" r="LR"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a</l><r><g><b/>a</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="negar a" alt="oci@gascon" r="LR"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a</l><r><g><b/>a</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="negar a" alt="oci@aran" r="RL"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/><p><l><b/><a/>a</l><r><g><b/>a</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="negar a" alt="oci@gascon" r="RL"><i>n</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/><p><l><b/><a/>a</l><r><g><b/>a</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="renegar"><i>ren</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="navegar"><i>nav</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="segregar"><i>segr</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repotegar"><i>repot</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="segar"><i>s</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ressegar"><i>ress</i><par n="moss/egar__vblex"/></e>
